Washington statutes.
RCW 36.73.100

Use of bond proceeds.

(1) The proceeds of any bond issued pursuant to RCW 36.73.070 or 36.73.080 may be used to pay costs incurred on a bond issue related to the sale and issuance of the bonds. These costs include payments for fiscal and legal expenses, obtaining bond ratings, printing, engraving, advertising, and other similar activities.

(2) In addition, proceeds of bonds used to fund capital projects may be used to pay the necessary and related engineering, architectural, planning, and inspection costs.

[ 2005 c 336 s 9; 1987 c 327 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 336: See note following RCW 36.73.015.